Utah statutes.
26-10-8.   Request for proposal required for non-state supplied services.

(1)  Funds provided to the department through Sections 51-9-201 and 59-14-204 to be used to provide services, shall be awarded to non-governmental entities based on a competitive process consistent with Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code.

(2)  Beginning July 1, 2010, and not more than every five years thereafter, the department shall issue requests for proposals for new or renewing contracts to award funding for programs under Subsection (1).

